Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-236
Judge and clerk of election; district inspector; service required; violation; penalty.

Each judge and clerk of election appointed pursuant to subsection (4) of section 32-230 and each district inspector appointed pursuant to subsection (2) of section 32-231 shall serve at all elections, except city and village elections, held in the county or precinct during his or her two-year term unless excused. A violation of this section by an appointee is a Class V misdemeanor. The county clerk shall submit the names of appointees violating this section to the local law enforcement agency for citation pursuant to sections 32-1549 and 32-1550.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 56;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 24;

Laws 1999, LB 802, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 1054, § 15;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 35.